Arkansas, session 2025, HB1581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1101(6), concerning the definition of
"sex offense" with respect to rights of victims of crime, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(T) Trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103; or
(U) Grooming a minor for future sex trafficking, § 5-18-
106;







*TNL214*
02/25/2025 7:54:01 AM TNL214